Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB31.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 156.153 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Danger zone" means the area within ten (10) feet of a school bus in any
direction; and[All school buses for which bids are made or bid contracts
awarded shall meet the standards and specifications of the Kentucky
Department of Education. The term ]
(b) "School bus" means[," as used in this section, shall mean] any motor vehicle
which meets the standards and specifications for school buses as provided by
law or by the standards or specifications of the Kentucky Department of
Education authorized by law and used solely in transporting school children
and school employees to and from school under the supervision and control
and at the direction of school authorities, and shall further include school bus
accessory equipment and supplies and replacement equipment considered to
be reasonably adaptable for purchase from price contract agreements.
(2) All school buses for which bids are made or a bid contract is awarded shall meet
the standards and specifications of the Kentucky Department of Education.
(3)[(b)] The standards and specifications for accessory equipment and supplies and
replacement equipment under subsection (2) of this section[paragraph (a) of this
subsection] shall be based on federal safety standards and shall not discriminate
among manufacturers unless the Kentucky Department of Education finds evidence
that a specific manufacturer's product is defective or dangerous to use.
(4)[(c)] The Kentucky Department of Education shall provide the list of standards and
specifications for accessory equipment and supplies and replacement equipment to
the Finance and Administration Cabinet for the purposes of maintaining the price
contract list required under KRS 45A.489.
Page 1 of 16
XXXX 12/20/2024 2:20 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 957
(5)[(2)] School buses shall be clearly marked as transporting students and shall
undergo a safety inspection no less than once every thirty (30) days.
(6)[(3)] (a) Districts may also use vehicles owned, leased, or contracted by the
district that were designed and built by the manufacturer for passenger
transportation of nine (9) or fewer passengers, including the driver, for
transporting students to and from school and approved school activities under
an alternative transportation plan approved by the Kentucky Department of
Education.
(b) Non-school bus passenger vehicles used under this subsection shall be clearly
marked as transporting students and undergo a safety inspection no less than
once every thirty (30) days.
(c) Non-school bus passenger vehicles used under this subsection shall be
operated by an employee or contractor of a local school district that has a
valid Class D operator's license. An individual that operates a non-school bus
passenger vehicle to transport a student or students without a current valid
license required by this paragraph shall be subject to the penalties set forth in
KRS 156.990(4).
(d) The Kentucky Board of Education shall promulgate administrative regulations
in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to establish:
1. Minimum standards and specifications for non-school bus passenger
vehicles used under this subsection, including a standard for minimum
insurance coverage;
2. Minimum route safety standards and pick-up and drop-off protocols for
pupil transportation using non-school bus passenger vehicles that
prohibit non-school bus passenger vehicles from depositing a student at
a location that would require the student to cross a road or intersection
to reach the student's destination; and
Page 2 of 16
XXXX 12/20/2024 2:20 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 957
3. Minimum qualifications, training, and drug testing requirements for an
individual to be authorized to transport any student to and from school
using a non-school bus passenger vehicle. The drug testing requirements
shall require an individual to submit to drug testing consistent with the
requirements of 49 C.F.R. pt. 40 to be authorized to transport students to
and from school using a non-school bus passenger vehicle.
(7)[(4)] As part of its regular procedure for establishing and updating standards and
specifications for school buses and non-school bus passenger vehicles, the
Kentucky Department of Education shall consider allowing school buses to operate
using clean transportation fuels, as defined in KRS 186.750. If the department
determines that school buses or non-school bus passenger vehicles may operate
using clean transportation fuels while maintaining the same or a higher degree of
safety as fuels currently allowed, it shall update its standards and specifications to
allow for such use.
(8) The Kentucky Department of Education shall:
(a) Consider requiring that any new school bus purchased on or after July 1,
2026, be equipped with:
1. Sensors to determine the presence of objects in the danger zone
around the bus;
2. Sensors warning the driver that the door is not completely closed; and
3. Interior cameras; and
(b) Promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter
13A to establish:
1. The design and installation standards for the sensors; and
2. Retention periods for interior camera recordings;
which may be required under this subsection.
(9) By June 30, 2026, the Kentucky Department of Education shall submit a report to
Page 3 of 16
XXXX 12/20/2024 2:20 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 957
the Legislative Research Commission for referral to the Interim Joint Committee
on Education regarding the availability and effectiveness of sensor technology.
Section 2. KRS 156.990 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Any witness who fails, without legal excuse, to attend or to testify, when required
by the chief state school officer under these provisions, shall be fined not more than
twenty-five dollars ($25) for each offense.
(2) Any person who violates any of the provisions of KRS 156.400 to 156.470 shall be
fined not more than five hundred dollars ($500) or imprisoned not more than three
(3) months, or both.
(3) A violation of subsection (1) of KRS 156.483 shall cause the Department of
Education to be fined not less than five hundred dollars ($500) or more than one
thousand dollars ($1,000).
(4) Any person who operates a non-school bus passenger vehicle to transport a student
or students within the Commonwealth without holding a current valid license as
required pursuant to KRS 156.153(6)[(3)](c) shall be guilty of a Class D felony.
Section 3. KRS 160.380 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Administrative finding of child abuse or neglect" means a substantiated
finding of child abuse or neglect issued by the Cabinet for Health and Family
Services that is:
1. Not appealed through an administrative hearing conducted in
accordance with KRS Chapter 13B;
2. Upheld at an administrative hearing conducted in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13B and not appealed to a Circuit Court; or
3. Upheld by a Circuit Court in an appeal of the results of an
administrative hearing conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B;
(b) "Alternative education program" means a program that exists to meet the
Page 4 of 16
XXXX 12/20/2024 2:20 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 957
needs of students that cannot be addressed in a traditional classroom setting
but through the assignment of students to alternative classrooms, centers, or
campuses that are designed to remediate academic performance, improve
behavior, or provide an enhanced learning experience. Alternative education
programs do not include career or technical centers or departments;
(c) "Clear CA/N check" means a letter from the Cabinet for Health and Family
Services indicating that there are no administrative findings of child abuse or
neglect relating to a specific individual;
(d) "Relative" means father, mother, brother, sister, husband, wife, son and
daughter; and
(e) "Vacancy" means any certified position opening created by the resignation,
dismissal, nonrenewal of contract, transfer, or death of a certified staff
member of a local school district, or a new position created in a local school
district for which certification is required. However, if an employer-employee
bargained contract contains procedures for filling certified position openings
created by the resignation, dismissal, nonrenewal of contract, transfer, or
death of a certified staff member, or creation of a new position for which
certification is required, a vacancy shall not exist, unless certified positions
remain open after compliance with those procedures.
(2) Except as provided in KRS 160.346, the school district personnel actions identified
in this section shall be carried out as follows:
(a) All appointments, promotions, and transfers of principals, supervisors,
teachers, and other public school employees shall be made only by the
superintendent of schools, who shall notify the board of the action taken. All
employees of the local district shall have the qualifications prescribed by law
and by the administrative regulations of the Kentucky Board of Education and
of the employing board. Supervisors, principals, teachers, and other
Page 5 of 16
XXXX 12/20/2024 2:20 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 957
employees may be appointed by the superintendent for any school year at any
time after February 1 preceding the beginning of the school year. No
superintendent of schools shall appoint or transfer himself or herself to
another position within the school district;
(b) When a vacancy occurs in a local school district, the superintendent shall
submit the job posting to the statewide job posting system described in KRS
160.152 fifteen (15) days before the position shall be filled. The local school
district shall post position openings in the local board office for public
viewing;
(c) When a vacancy needs to be filled in less than fifteen (15) days' time to
prevent disruption of necessary instructional or support services of the school
district, the superintendent may seek a waiver from the chief state school
officer. If the waiver is approved, the appointment shall not be made until the
person recommended for the position has been approved by the chief state
school officer. The chief state school officer shall respond to a district's
request for waiver or for approval of an appointment within two (2) working
days; and
(d) When a vacancy occurs in a local district, the superintendent shall conduct a
search to locate minority teachers to be considered for the position. The
superintendent shall, pursuant to administrative regulations of the Kentucky
Board of Education, report annually the district's recruitment process and the
activities used to increase the percentage of minority teachers in the district.
(3) Restrictions on employment of relatives shall be as follows:
(a) No relative of a superintendent of schools shall be an employee of the school
district. However, this shall not apply to a relative who is a classified or
certified employee of the school district for at least thirty-six (36) months
prior to the superintendent assuming office and who is qualified for the
Page 6 of 16
XXXX 12/20/2024 2:20 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 957
position the employee holds. A superintendent's spouse who has previously
been employed in a school system may be an employee of the school district.
A superintendent's spouse who is employed under this provision shall not hold
a position in which the spouse supervises certified or classified employees. A
superintendent's spouse may supervise teacher aides and student teachers.
However, the superintendent shall not promote a relative who continues
employment under an exception of this subsection;
(b) No superintendent shall employ a relative of a school board member of the
district;
(c) No principal's relative shall be employed in the principal's school; and
(d) A relative that is ineligible for employment under paragraph (a), (b), or (c) of
this subsection may be employed as a substitute for a certified or classified
employee if the relative is not:
1. A regular full-time or part-time employee of the district;
2. Accruing continuing contract status or any other right to continuous
employment;
3. Receiving fringe benefits other than those provided other substitutes; or
4. Receiving preference in employment or assignment over other
substitutes.
(4) No superintendent shall assign a certified or classified staff person to an alternative
education program as part of any disciplinary action taken pursuant to KRS 161.011
or 161.790 as part of a corrective action plan established pursuant to the local
district evaluation plan.
(5) No superintendent shall employ in any position in the district any person who:
(a) Has been convicted of an offense that would classify a person as a violent
offender under KRS 439.3401;
(b) Has been convicted of a sex crime as defined by KRS 17.500 or a
Page 7 of 16
XXXX 12/20/2024 2:20 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 957
misdemeanor offense under KRS Chapter 510;
(c) Is required to register as a sex offender under KRS 17.500 to 17.580; or
(d) Has an administrative finding of child abuse or neglect in records maintained
by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services.
(6) Requirements for background checks shall be as follows:
(a) A superintendent shall require the following individuals to submit to a
national and state criminal background check by the Department of Kentucky
State Police and the Federal Bureau of Investigation and have a clear CA/N
check, provided by the individual:
1. Each new certified or classified hire;
2. A nonfaculty coach or nonfaculty assistant as defined under KRS
161.185;
3. A student teacher;
4. A school-based decision making council parent member; and
5. Any adult who is permitted access to school grounds on a regularly
scheduled and continuing basis pursuant to a written agreement for the
purpose of providing services directly to a student or students as part of
a school-sponsored program or activity;
(b) 1. The requirements of paragraph (a) of this subsection shall not apply to:
a. Classified and certified individuals employed by the school district
prior to June 27, 2019;
b. Certified individuals who were employed in another certified
position in a Kentucky school district within six (6) months of the
date of hire and who had previously submitted to a national and
state criminal background check and who have a clear CA/N check
for the previous employment; or
c. Student teachers who have submitted to and provide a copy of a
Page 8 of 16
XXXX 12/20/2024 2:20 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 957
national and state criminal background check by the Department
of Kentucky State Police and the Federal Bureau of Investigation
through an accredited teacher education institution in which the
student teacher is enrolled and who have a clear CA/N check.
2. The Education Professional Standards Board may promulgate
administrative regulations to impose additional qualifications to meet
the requirements of Pub. L. No. 92-544;
(c) A parent member may serve prior to the receipt of the criminal history
background check and CA/N letter required by paragraph (a) of this
subsection but shall be removed from the council on receipt by the school
district of a report documenting a record of abuse or neglect, or a sex crime or
criminal offense against a victim who is a minor as defined in KRS 17.500, or
as a violent offender as defined in KRS 17.165, and no further procedures
shall be required;
(d) A superintendent may require a volunteer or a visitor to submit to a national
and state criminal history background check by the Department of Kentucky
State Police and the Federal Bureau of Investigation and have a clear CA/N
check, provided by the individual; and
(e) The superintendent of a school district operating under an alternative
transportation plan approved by the Kentucky Department of Education in
accordance with KRS 156.153(6)[(3)] shall require the driver of any non-
school bus passenger vehicle authorized to transport students to and from
school pursuant to the alternative transportation plan who does not have a
valid commercial driver's license issued in accordance with KRS Chapter
281A with an "S" endorsement to:
1. Submit to a national and state criminal background check by the
Department of Kentucky State Police and the Federal Bureau of
Page 9 of 16
XXXX 12/20/2024 2:20 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 957
Investigation at least once every three (3) years and a criminal records
check conducted in accordance with KRS 27A.090 in all other years;
2. Submit to drug testing consistent with the requirements of 49 C.F.R. pt.
40;
3. Provide a biannual driving history record check performed by the
Transportation Cabinet;
4. Provide an annual clear CA/N check;
5. Immediately notify the superintendent of any conviction for a violation
under KRS Chapter 189 for which penalty points are assessed; and
6. Immediately notify the superintendent of any citation or arrest for a
violation of any provision of KRS Chapter 189A. The superintendent
shall inform the Kentucky Department of Education of the notification.
(7) (a) If a certified or classified position remains unfilled after July 31 or if a
vacancy occurs during a school term, a superintendent may employ an
individual, who will have supervisory or disciplinary authority over minors,
on probationary status pending receipt of the criminal history background
check and a clear CA/N check, provided by the individual. Application for the
criminal record and a request for a clear CA/N check of a probationary
employee shall be made no later than the date probationary employment
begins.
(b) Employment shall be contingent on the receipt of the criminal history
background check documenting that the probationary employee has no record
of a sex crime nor as a violent offender as defined in KRS 17.165 and receipt
of a letter, provided by the individual, from the Cabinet for Health and Family
Services stating the employee is clear to hire based on no administrative
findings of child abuse or neglect found through a background check of child
abuse and neglect records maintained by the Cabinet for Health and Family
Page 10 of 16
XXXX 12/20/2024 2:20 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 957
Services.
(c) Notwithstanding KRS 161.720 to 161.800 or any other statute to the contrary,
probationary employment under this section shall terminate on receipt by the
school district of a criminal history background check documenting a record
of a sex crime or as a violent offender as defined in KRS 17.165 and no
further procedures shall be required.
(8) The provisions of KRS 161.790 shall apply to terminate employment of a certified
employee on the basis of a criminal record other than a record of a sex crime or as a
violent offender as defined in KRS 17.165, or on the basis of a CA/N check
showing an administrative finding of child abuse or neglect.
(9) (a) All fingerprints requested under this section shall be on an applicant
fingerprint card provided by the Department of Kentucky State Police. The
fingerprint cards shall be forwarded to the Federal Bureau of Investigation
from the Department of Kentucky State Police after a state criminal
background check is conducted. The results of the state and federal criminal
background check shall be sent to the hiring superintendent. Any fee charged
by the Department of Kentucky State Police, the Federal Bureau of
Investigation, and the Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall be an
amount no greater than the actual cost of processing the request and
conducting the search.
(b) Each application form, provided by the employer to an applicant for a
certified or classified position, shall conspicuously state the following: "FOR
THIS TYPE OF EMPLOYMENT, STATE LAW REQUIRES A NATIONAL
AND STATE CRIMINAL HISTORY BACKGROUND CHECK AND A
LETTER, PROVIDED BY THE INDIVIDUAL, FROM THE CABINET
FOR HEALTH AND FAMILY SERVICES STATING THE APPLICANT
HAS NO ADMINISTRATIVE FINDINGS OF CHILD ABUSE OR
Page 11 of 16
XXXX 12/20/2024 2:20 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 957
NEGLECT FOUND THROUGH A BACKGROUND CHECK OF CHILD
ABUSE AND NEGLECT RECORDS MAINTAINED BY THE CABINET
FOR HEALTH AND FAMILY SERVICES."
(c) Each application form for a district position shall require the applicant to:
1. Identify the states in which he or she has maintained residency,
including the dates of residency; and
2. Provide picture identification.
(10) Notwithstanding any provision of the Kentucky Revised Statutes to the contrary,
when an employee of the school district is charged with any offense which is
classified as a felony, the superintendent may transfer the employee to a second
position until such time as the employee is found not guilty, the charges are
dismissed, the employee is terminated, or the superintendent determines that further
personnel action is not required. The employee shall continue to be paid at the same
rate of pay he or she received prior to the transfer. If an employee is charged with
an offense outside of the Commonwealth, this provision may also be applied if the
charge would have been treated as a felony if committed within the
Commonwealth. Transfers shall be made to prevent disruption of the educational
process and district operations and in the interest of students and staff and shall not
be construed as evidence of misconduct.
(11) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, each certified and classified employee of
the school district shall notify the superintendent if he or she has been found by the
Cabinet for Health and Family Services to have abused or neglected a child, and if
he or she has waived the right to appeal a substantiated finding of child abuse or
neglect or if the substantiated incident was upheld upon appeal. Any failure to
report this finding shall result in the certified or classified employee being subject
to dismissal or termination.
(12) The form for requesting a CA/N check shall be made available on the Cabinet for
Page 12 of 16
XXXX 12/20/2024 2:20 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 957
Health and Family Services website.
Section 4. KRS 189.540 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Kentucky Board of Education shall promulgate administrative regulations to
govern the design and operation of all Kentucky school buses and to govern the
operation of district-owned passenger vehicles transporting students under KRS
156.153(6)[(2)]. The board shall, with the advice and aid of the Department of
Kentucky State Police and the Transportation Cabinet, enforce the administrative
regulations governing the operation of all school buses whether owned by a school
district or privately contracted and all district-owned passenger vehicles
transporting students under KRS 156.153(6)[(2)]. The regulations covering the
operation shall by reference be made a part of any contract with a school district.
Every school district and private contractor referred to under this subsection shall
be subject to those regulations.
(2) Any employee of any school district who violates any of the administrative
regulations in any contract executed on behalf of a school district shall be subject to
removal from office. Any person operating a school bus under contract with a
school district who fails to comply with any of the administrative regulations shall
be guilty of breach of contract and the contract shall be canceled after proper notice
and a hearing by the responsible officers of such school district.
(3) Any person who operates a school bus shall be required to possess a commercial
driver's license issued pursuant to KRS 281A.170 with a school bus endorsement as
described in KRS 281A.175.
Section 5. KRS 281.635 is amended to read as follows:
Notwithstanding anything contained in this chapter:
(1) All cities of the Commonwealth are vested with the power to grant authorization for
the operation of buses over their streets and highways. Upon acquiring
authorization, the holder of the authorization shall apply to the Department of
Page 13 of 16
XXXX 12/20/2024 2:20 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 957
Vehicle Regulation for a bus certificate;[.]
(2) The governing body of any city in the Commonwealth in which city buses operate
shall have supervisory and regulatory power over such buses, while operating in the
city, and shall have authority to enforce all ordinances or regulations pertaining to
routes, services, time schedules, and operation of the buses and the drivers thereof,
but any interested party may appeal to the department from any action, finding, or
order of any city within thirty (30) days after the entry of the action, finding, or
order, and a hearing shall be held in accordance with KRS 281.640; however, any
action, finding, or order of any city shall be sustained if there is substantial evidence
or reason to support it; otherwise the department shall make the orders as it deems
necessary and proper. However, where a carrier's entire operation is confined to
intracity transportation within the corporate limits of a single city, there shall be no
appeal to the department from the actions, findings, or orders of the city. Provided
further, that where any city bus is subject to the regulatory powers of more than one
(1) city and the regulations are in conflict or such as to impede the transportation
facilities serving the cities, or the carrier is failing to furnish safe, adequate and
convenient service to the public, the department may, upon complaint or on its own
initiative, call a hearing and enter orders as are necessary and proper;[.]
(3) The governing body of any city of the first class, a city with a population equal to or
greater than twenty thousand (20,000) based upon the most recent federal decennial
census, and the city's suburban area, or the corporate limits of any city and its
suburban area located in a county which contains a city of the first class, a city with
a population equal to or greater than twenty thousand (20,000) based upon the most
recent federal decennial census, or an urban-county government, in the
Commonwealth in which taxicabs, limousines, or disabled persons vehicles operate
shall have concurrent supervisory and regulatory power over those certified carriers
operating from the city, and shall have authority to enforce all ordinances or
Page 14 of 16
XXXX 12/20/2024 2:20 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 957
regulations pertaining to their operation, but any interested party may appeal to the
department from any action, finding, or order of any city within thirty (30) days
after the entry of the action, finding, or order, and a hearing shall be held in
accordance with KRS 281.640; however, any action, finding, or order of any city
shall be sustained if there is substantial evidence or reason to support it; otherwise,
the department shall make any orders that it deems necessary and proper. Where
any taxicab, limousine, or disabled persons vehicle carrier is subject to the
regulatory powers of more than one (1) city and the regulations of those cities are in
conflict or impede serving the transportation needs of the Commonwealth, the
department may, upon complaint or on its own initiative, call a hearing and enter
orders as are necessary and proper, including establishing or requiring the
establishment of uniform regulations;[.]
(4) The governing body of any city of the first class, a city with a population equal to or
greater than twenty thousand (20,000) based upon the most recent federal decennial
census, and the city's suburban area, or the corporate limits of any city and its
suburban area located in a county which contains a city of the first class, a city with
a population equal to or greater than twenty thousand (20,000) based upon the most
recent federal decennial census, or an urban-county government, in the
Commonwealth is hereby vested with the concurrent power to prescribe the
qualifications with respect to the health, vision, sobriety, intelligence, ability, moral
character, and experience of the drivers of taxicabs, limousines, or disabled persons
vehicles operating from the city, and while operating in the city, and may issue
permits for qualified drivers. However, any taxicab, limousine, disabled persons
vehicle, or TNC vehicle driver must also possess a valid operator's license from
Kentucky or another jurisdiction;[.]
(5) The governing body of any city in the Commonwealth in which city buses operate
is encouraged to consider requiring any new bus purchased on or after July 1,
Page 15 of 16
XXXX 12/20/2024 2:20 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 957
2026, be equipped with sensor technology as set forth in subsection (8) of Section
1 of this Act; and
(6) The governing body of a city shall not have authority over a motor vehicle that is
being operated as a human service transportation delivery vehicle under a contract
with the Transportation Cabinet in accordance with KRS 96A.095(4).
Section 6. Subsection (8) of Section 1 of this Act may be cited as Ally's Law.
Page 16 of 16
XXXX 12/20/2024 2:20 PM Jacketed